Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-119.2 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The purpose of this section is to establish the State of
Oklahoma's participation in the federal Summer Electronic Benefit
Transfer for Children (Summer EBT) program to provide supplemental
nutrition assistance to eligible children during the summer months
when school is not in session beginning on June 1, 2026, and beyond.
B. The Oklahoma Department of Human Services (OKDHS) shall
administer the Summer EBT Program in accordance with federal
regulations and guidelines.
Req. No. 11134 Page 1

C. The Department of Human Services shall work with the State
Department of Education to determine eligibility of children and
reduce administrative burden on qualifying families for the Summer
EBT program established pursuant to the federal Consolidated
Appropriations Act, 2023.
D. The Department of Human Services and the State Department of
Education shall share all data determined by each Department to be
necessary to implement and administer the Summer EBT program
statewide.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11134 SW 01/11/25








Req. No. 11134 Page 2